Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

257.990.
Penalties.

Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, any person who violates any administrative regulation promulgated by the board under the provisions of this chapter, for the violation of which no other penalty is provided in this section, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense; for each subsequent offense he shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

This subsection shall not apply to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

257.196

.

Any person who violates KRS

257.040

shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person who violates KRS

257.050

shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense; for each subsequent offense he shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and shall be imprisoned for not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred and twenty (120) days.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of KRS

257.060

shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for the first offense; for each subsequent offense he shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall be imprisoned for not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred and twenty (120) days.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

257.060

shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

257.080

or

257.180

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

257.160

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense. For each subsequent offense, he shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who violates any ruling of the board or who hinders any agent of the board in carrying out the duties assigned to him, or any officer who refuses to enforce the provisions of this chapter when called upon by the board to do so, or any other person who in any way attempts to hinder or obstruct the board in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS

257.330

to

257.350

or the regulations made thereunder for carrying out their provisions, or who fails or refuses to comply with or intends to deceive, or who answers or represents falsely in response to any requirement of KRS

257.330

to

257.350

, or who willfully interferes with the Office of State Veterinarian or their employees or agents, in the carrying out of their duties provided in KRS 257.330 to 257.350, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of KRS 257.330 to 257.350 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in any sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall violate any provision of KRS

257.370

to

257.460

or any rule or regulation made under authority thereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in any sum not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who resists, obstructs, interferes with, threatens, attempts to intimidate, or in any other manner interferes with an officer under KRS

257.490

or who willfully refuses to obey his lawful orders shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the county jail not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

47, 47a, 63a-11(5), 63c-2 to 63c-6, 63c-8, 63c-11, 63c-14, 1332: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 196, § 2; 1946, ch. 86, § 2; 1946, ch. 103, §§ 7, 8; 1948, ch. 19, § 2; 1948, ch. 165, § 7; 1970, ch. 92, § 79; 1972, ch. 244, § 3; 1972, ch. 277, § 4; 1976, ch. 167, § 2; 1978, ch. 296, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 234, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 97, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 120, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 225, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 106, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The state veterinarian and his representatives have the authority and power to proceed to inspect and test cattle, wherever found, for contagious or communicable disease and any person who refuses to permit such inspection or testing will be subject to prosecution under KRS 246.990(2), 257.990(1) or 257.990(10).

OAG 60-973

.